de: Heimwerkerbedarf > Sanitär > Rohrverbindungsstücke & -halterungen > Druckminderer: Druckregler; Temperaturregler
lt-LT: Techninė įranga > Santechnika > Santechnikos detalės ir atramos > Santechniniai reguliatoriai: Slėgio reguliatoriai; Temperatūros reguliatoriai
es: Bricolaje > Fontanería > Accesorios de fontanería > Reguladores de fontanería: Reguladores de presión; Reguladores de temperatura
nl: Bouwmaterialen > Loodgieterswerk > Loodgietersbenodigdheden > Afvoerbegrenzers: Reduceerventielen; Temperatuurbegrenzers
sl-SI: Gradbena oprema > Vodovod > Vodovodne armature in nosilci > Vodovodni regulatorji tlaka: Regulatorji tlaka; Regulatorji temperature
cs: Kutilství a řemeslo > Vodoinstalace > Vodovodní armatury > Instalatérské regulátory: Regulátory tlaku; Regulátory teploty
sk-SK: Náradie > Vodoinštalačné práce > Vodovodné armatúry a podpery > Vodovodné regulátory: Regulátory tlaku; Regulátory teploty
it: Articoli di ferramenta > Prodotti idraulici > Supporti e raccordi per tubi > Regolatori idraulici: Regolatori di pressione; Regolatori di temperatura
ko: 철물 > 배관 > 배관 부속품/지지대 > 배관 레귤레이터: 압력 레귤레이터; 온도 레귤레이터
zh-TW: 硬體 > 管線 > 管線接頭/支架 > 水管調節器: 壓力調節器; 溫度調節器
ja: DIY用品 > 水道設備 > 配管部品 > 水圧調整レギュレータ: 水圧調整器; 温度調節器
zh-CN: 五金/硬件 > 管道 > 水管配件/支架 > 管道减压阀: 压力调节器; 温度调节器
da: Isenkram > Sanitet > Rørstykker > Sanitetsregulatorer: Trykregulatorer; Temperaturregulatorer
hr-HR: Željezarija > Vodoinstalaterska oprema > Vodovodni priključci i nosači > Vodovodni regulatori: Regulatori tlaka; Regulatori temperature
th: ฮาร์ดแวร์ > ระบบท่อประปา > ที่ติดตั้งระบบท่อ > อุปกรณ์ควบคุมการไหลเวียนของน้ำ: เครื่องปรับความดัน; เครื่องควบคุมอุณหภูมิ
fr: Quincaillerie > Plomberie > Fixations et supports de plomberie > Régulateurs de plomberie: Régulateurs de pression; Régulateurs de température
hu: Hardver > Vízvezeték > Vízvezeték-szerelvények és -támasztékok > Vízvezeték-szabályzók: Nyomásszabályozók; Hőmérséklet-szabályozók
tr: Hırdavat > Sıhhi tesisat > Sıhhi Tesisat Bağlantı Parçaları > Sıhhi Tesisat Regülatörleri: Basınç Regülatörleri; Sıcaklık Regülatörleri
fi: Rakentaminen > Putkityöt > Putkien osat ja kiinnikkeet > Putkisäätimet: Paineensäätimet; Lämpötilasäätimet
bg-BG: Железария > Водоснабдяване и канализация > Водопроводни фитинги и опори > Водопроводни регулатори: Регулатори на налягането; Температурни регулатори
pt-PT: Equipamento > Canalização > Encaixes e suportes de canalização > Reguladores de canalização: Reguladores de pressão; Reguladores de temperatura
ru: Оборудование и технические изделия > Системы водоснабжения и водоотведения > Фитинги и крепления для труб > Регулирующая водопроводная арматура: Регуляторы давления; Регуляторы температуры
vi: Phần cứng > Đường ống > Ống - khớp nối > Bộ điều chỉnh ống nước: Bộ điều chỉnh áp suất; Bộ điều chỉnh nhiệt độ
nb: Maskinvare > Rørlegging > Rørfester og -støtter > Rørregulatorer: Trykkregulatorer; Temperaturregulatorer
pt-BR: Ferragens > Encanamento > Juntas e conexões para encanamento > Reguladores para encanamento: Reguladores de pressão; Reguladores de temperatura
ro-RO: Feronerie > Instalații sanitare > Fitinguri și suporturi sanitare > Regulatoare pentru instalații sanitare: Regulatoare de presiune; Regulatoare de temperatură
sv: Metallprodukter > Rörmokeri > Rördelar > Rörregulatorer: Tryckregulatorer; Temperaturregulatorer
en: Hardware > Plumbing > Plumbing Fittings & Supports > Plumbing Regulators: Pressure Regulators; Temperature Regulators
pl: Sprzęt > Systemy hydrauliczne > Mocowania hydrauliczne > Regulatory hydrauliczne: Regulatory ciśnienia; Regulatory temperatury
el: Υλικά κατασκευών > Υδραυλικές εγκαταστάσεις > Εξαρτήματα & στηρίγματα υδραυλικών εγκαταστάσεων > Ρυθμιστές σωλήνων υδραυλικών εγκαταστάσεων: Ρυθμιστές πίεσης; Ρυθμιστές θερμοκρασίας